District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.19

Repealed

Expenses of organization, reorganization, and financing.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 188, ch. 269, § 19
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.19.
1981 Ed., § 29-319.
1973 Ed., § 29-908f.